src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> NIKOSIIJADECL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> NIKOSIIJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> NIKOSIIJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON NIKOSIIJADECL !Names with ending -iija, a-illative
ACCRA-DC ;
 ACCRA-I ;
 ACCRA-OBL ;
 ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON NIKOSIIJADECL_PLC-ORG !Names with ending -iija, a-illative
ACCRA-DC ;
 ACCRA-I ;
 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
! ACCRA-IICASE ;



LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DAVVISUOLUDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV3 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV4 ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>Y5 VUONAT ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU_MWE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DAVVISUOLUDECL ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU_MWE-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> DAVVISUOLUDECL ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLUDECL !Inanim. Contracted 0-Names - from DAVVISUOLU
@U.Cap.Obl@ DAVVISUOLU-OBL ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-OBL
+Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
+Ess:X4n K ;
+Ess+Err/Orth:Y6n K ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X8 RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom:X4 RHyph ;
+Sg+Gen:Y5 K ;
+Sg+Acc:Y5 K ;
+Sg+Loc:Y5s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:Y5n K ; !SOUTH
!+Pl+Nom:Y5 K ;
+Sg+Ill:Y6j K ;
+Sg+Com:Y6jn K ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>Y6jd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:%>Y6jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>Y6jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:%>Y6jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:%>Y6jgujn K ;

LEXICON MARJA-A-ani
 MARJA-ani ;

LEXICON MARJA-A-fem
 MARJA-fem ;

LEXICON MARJA-A-mal
 MARJA-mal ;

LEXICON MARJA-A-obj
 MARJA-obj ;

LEXICON MARJA-A-org
 MARJA-org ;

LEXICON LANDA-plc
:lánºda MARJA-A-plc ;
+Err/Orth-a-á:lanºda MARJA-A-plc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:lándas K ;


LEXICON MARJA-A-plc
 MARJA-plc ;

LEXICON MARJA-A-sur
 MARJA-sur ;


LEXICON MARJA-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> MARJADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>X6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> MARJADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>X6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> MARJADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>X6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJA-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;

!LEXICON MARJA-LOAN-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> MARJADECL-LOAN ;
!+Err/Lex:%> PLACELASH ; !
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Lex:%>X4 VUONAT ; !

LEXICON MARJA-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-PLX:%>X4 VUONAT ;

LEXICON MARJA_MWE-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> MARJADECL ;



LEXICON MARJA-I-ani
 MARJA-IU-ani ;

LEXICON MARJA-I-fem
 MARJA-IU-fem ;

LEXICON MARJA-I-mal
 MARJA-IU-mal ;

LEXICON MARJA-I-obj
 MARJA-IU-obj ;

LEXICON MARJA-I-org
 MARJA-IU-org ;

LEXICON MARJA-I-plc
 MARJA-IU-plc ;

LEXICON MARJA-I-sur
 MARJA-IU-sur ;

LEXICON MARJA-U-ani
 MARJA-IU-ani ;

LEXICON MARJA-U-fem
 MARJA-IU-fem ;

LEXICON MARJA-U-mal
 MARJA-IU-mal ;

LEXICON MARJA-U-obj
 MARJA-IU-obj ;

LEXICON MARJA-U-org
  MARJA-IU-org ;

LEXICON MARJA-U-plc
 MARJA-IU-plc ;

LEXICON MARJA-U-sur
 MARJA-IU-sur ;


LEXICON MARJA-IU-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> MARJADECL-IU ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>X6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-IU-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> MARJADECL-IU ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>X6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-IU-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> MARJADECL-IU ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>X6ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-IU-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL-IU ;

LEXICON MARJA-IU-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL-IU_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-IU-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> MARJADECL-IU_PLC-ORG ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> MARJADECL-IU_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-PLX:%>X4 VUONAT ;

LEXICON MARJA-IU_MWE-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> MARJADECL-IU_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-IU-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> MARJADECL-IU ;



LEXICON MARJADECL ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
ACCRA-DC ;
:X3 ACCRA-I ;
:X4 ACCRA-OBL ;
:X5 ACCRA-IICASE ;
:X5 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;

LEXICON MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person and place names)
ACCRA-DC ;
:X3 ACCRA-I ;
:X4 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
:X5 ACCRA-IICASE ;
:X5 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;


LEXICON MARJADECL-IU ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
ACCRA-DC ;
:X3 ACCRA-I ;
:X4 ACCRA-OBL ;
:X8 MARJA-SHORTGEN ;
:X5 ACCRA-IICASE ;
:X5 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;

LEXICON MARJADECL-IU_PLC-ORG ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
      ACCRA-DC           ; !Ess, Nom, R..
  :X3 ACCRA-I            ; !Ill
  :X4 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG  ;
  :X8 MARJA-SHORTGEN     ;
  :X5 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;
! :X5 ACCRA-IICASE       ;

!LEXICON MARJADECL-LOAN ! Vowel-final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (person names)
!ACCRA-DC-LOAN ;
!+Err/Lex:X3 ACCRA-I ; !
!+Err/Lex:X4 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
!+Err/Lex:X8 MARJA-SHORTGEN ; !
!:X5 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;

!+Err/Orth:X5 ACCRA-IICASE ; !

LEXICON MARJA-SHORTGEN  ! Gásakjávrre
@U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-SHORTGENcase ;

LEXICON MARJA-SHORTGENcase
+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG: K ; !
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:   RHyph ; ! for placenames

LEXICON GABNA-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation bn:pn and Ill ^change (place names)
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> GABNA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-PLX:pná%> VUONAT ;

LEXICON GABNA ! Vowel final names with Gradation bn:pn and Ill ^change (place names)
:bná ACCRA-DC ;
:bná ACCRA-I ;
:pná ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
:pná ACCRA-IICASE ;
:pná ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;

+Err/Orth:bná ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+Err/Orth:bná ACCRA-IICASE ;
+Err/Orth:bná ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;
+Err/Orth-á-a:bna ACCRA-DC ; 
+Err/Orth-á-a:bna ACCRA-I ;
+Err/Orth-á-a:pna ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;  ! Gapna
+Err/Orth-á-a:pna ACCRA-IICASE ;
+Err/Orth-á-a:pna ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;




LEXICON SUOPMA-plc !for Sápmi, Suopma, Ruoŧŧa, no laš, no VUONAK
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SUOPMA-org !for Sápmi, Suopma, Ruoŧŧa, no laš, no VUONAK
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON SUOPMA-obj !for Sápmi, Suopma, Ruoŧŧa, no laš, no VUONAK
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> SIJTEDECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> SIJTEDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SIJTE-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  SIJTEDECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  SIJTEDECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> SIJTEDECL ;

LEXICON SIJTE-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  SIJTEDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  SIJTEDECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;



LEXICON SIJTEDECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for SIJTE, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA ! Muhto gč. dat kommentára... Imaštallan dan gal veha...
ACCRA-DC ;                          !Nom, Ess
!+Err/Orth:W9 ACCRA-I ;
+Err/Orth: SIJTE-I ;
! Here, we allow for Illative Sijtei
!Dát ii oro doibmamin, go Sijtei lea dovdameahttun lookupis. W9hmm, sáhtá leat konv-feailla.
!Does not work, W9 is commented out in twol.
!NB! Sijtii is norm, Sijtei is SUB, the -ei-illative should just be used in cases like Marie (where it already works)
 ACCRA-I ;      !Here, we allow for Illative Sijtii
 ACCRA-OBL ;
 ACCRA-IICASE ;
:X5 ACCRA-IICASE ;


LEXICON SIJTEDECL_PLC-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for SIJTE, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA ! Muhto gč. dat kommentára... Imaštallan dan gal veha...
ACCRA-DC ;                          !Nom, Ess
!+Err/Orth:W9 ACCRA-I ;
+Err/Orth: SIJTE-I ;
 ! Here, we allow for Illative Sijtei
!Dát ii oro doibmamin, go Sijtei lea dovdameahttun lookupis. W9hmm, sáhtá leat konv-feailla.
!Does not work, W9 is commented out in twol.
!NB! Sijtii is norm, Sijtei is SUB, the -ei-illative should just be used in cases like Marie (where it already works)
 ACCRA-I ;      !Here, we allow for Illative Sijtii
 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON SIJTE-I
@U.Cap.Obl@ SIJTE-Icase ;

LEXICON SIJTE-Icase
+Sg+Ill:i K ;


LEXICON GUOLBBA-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> GUOLBBADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%>X4 DenominalAdjsC3 ;  !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+Use/-PLX:X4 VUONAT ;

LEXICON GUOLBBA_MWE-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> GUOLBBADECL ;

LEXICON GUOLBBA-obj ! Object names
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> GUOLBBADECL ;

LEXICON GUOLBBA-ani ! Animal names
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> GUOLBBADECL ;


LEXICON GUOLBBADECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ GUOLBBA-OBL ;

LEXICON GUOLBBA-OBL
+Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
+Ess:X4n K ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X8 RHyph ; !
+Cmp/SgNom:X4 RHyph ;
+Sg+Gen:X2a K ; ! MALLAS- but for Prop
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:X2 K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen:X2a RHyph ; !compound also for these
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:X2 RHyph ;  !compound also for these
+Sg+Acc:X2a K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:X2 K ; !
!+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
+Sg+Ill:X2ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:X2is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X2in K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:X2ijn K ;
!+Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
!+Cmp/PlGen:X2ijd RHyph ;
!+Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:X2ijgujn K ;


LEXICON ACCRA-DC          ! a. Earlier solution   | b. Ideal solution
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-NE ; ! U.Cap.Obl Accra       | Accra


LEXICON ACCRA-NE
               +Sg+Nom:  K     ;
                 +Attr:  K     ;
            +Cmp/SgNom:  RHyph ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:X7  RProp ;
                  +Ess:n K     ;

LEXICON ACCRA-DC-LOAN     ! a. Earlier solution   | b. Ideal solution
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-NE-LOAN ; ! U.Cap.Obl Accra       | Accra


LEXICON ACCRA-NE-LOAN
               +Sg+Nom:  K     ;
            +Cmp/SgNom:  RHyph ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:  RProp ;


LEXICON ACCRA-I
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-Icase ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Icase
          +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:i  K ; ! -ei
          +Sg+Ill:j  K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ij K ;

LEXICON ACCRA-OBL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBLcase ;

LEXICON ACCRA-OBLcase
                +Sg+Gen:  K     ;
    +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:  RHyph ; ! for placenames
                +Sg+Acc:  K     ;
                +Sg+Loc:s K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K     ; !SOUTH
                +Pl+Nom:t K     ;


LEXICON ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG_loc_ill_com
@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORGcase_loc_ill_com ;

LEXICON ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORGcase_loc_ill_com
              +Cmp/SgGen:   RHyph ; ! for placenames
              +Cmp/SgGen:   RProp ; ! for placenames
                 +Sg+Loc:s  K     ;
          +Sg+Ill:j  K ;
          +Sg+Com:jn K ;


LEXICON ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG
@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORGcase ;

LEXICON ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORGcase
                 +Sg+Gen:   K     ;
              +Cmp/SgGen:   RHyph ; ! for placenames
              +Cmp/SgGen:   RProp ; ! for placenames
                 +Sg+Acc:   K     ;
                 +Sg+Loc:s  K     ;
        +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as K     ;
  +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n  K     ; !SOUTH
!                +Pl+Nom:t  K     ;

LEXICON ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM
@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOMcase ;

LEXICON ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOMcase
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:in K ; ! -ei
+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ajn K ; !Valkeapääain

LEXICON ACCRA-IICASE
@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASEcase ;

LEXICON ACCRA-IICASEcase
+Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:id9 K ; ! -ei
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:id9 K ; ! -ei
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ide K ; ! -ei
+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:in K ; ! -ei
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:igujn K ; ! -ei


LEXICON ACCRA_forms_plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:  flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:  flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:  flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc:s  flagK ;


LEXICON MARJA_CGforms_plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:  flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:  flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc:s  flagK ;
